Washington statutes.
RCW 40.14.140

Legislative records—Party caucuses to be advised—Information and instructions.

It shall be the duty of the clerk and the secretary to advise the party caucuses in each house concerning the necessity to keep public records. The state archivist or his or her representative shall work with the clerk and secretary to provide information and instructions on the best method for keeping legislative records.

[ 2011 c 336 s 821; 1971 ex.s. c 102 s 6.]